Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this  2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) There shall be subtracted from  federal taxable income any amount re-
ceived in judgment or settlement of a civil  action arising from a wildfire, as defined in ORS
477.089, and awarded to a plaintiff.
(2) A subtraction under this section is allowed only for resolution of civil actions  arising
from a wildfire that:
(a) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(b) Occurs in an area subject to  an executive order of the Governor invoking the Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(c) Is a federally  declared disaster, as defined in section 165 of the Internal Revenue
Code, whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(3) A subtraction under this section:
(a) Is not allowed for any amount described in subsection (1) of this section that is  taken
into account as a deduction or credit on the taxpayer’s federal  income tax return for any tax
year; and
(b) Is allowed only to the extent that losses, expenses or other damages compensated  by
the amount of the judgment or settlement are not  compensated for by insurance or other-
wise.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Wildfire” means a wildfire as defined in ORS 477.089, that:
(A) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(B) Occurs in an area subject to an executive order of the Governor invoking the Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(C) Is a federally declared disaster, as defined in  section 165 of the Internal Revenue
Code, whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(b) “Wildfire-related  litigation” means litigation through which a plaintiff seeks compen-
sation for losses, expenses or damages found to be caused by a wildfire.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-B) Page 1
(2) There may be subtracted from federal taxable income the amount:
(a) That would be allowable under  sections 63(d) and 67 of the Internal Revenue Code as
amended and in effect on December 21, 2017, and as applicable to tax years beginning before
January 1, 2018, as a deduction for legal fees incurred by a plaintiff  in wildfire-related liti-
gation; and
(b) As applicable to the tax year of the taxpayer.
(3) A subtraction under this section is allowed regardless of whether the taxpayer  elects
to deduct itemized deductions on the taxpayer’s federal or state return.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 2 of this 2024 Act applies to declarations and executive  orders
issued on or after January 1,  2018, and before January 1, 2026, and, notwithstanding ORS
315.037, to amounts received in all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2018.
(2) Section 3 of this 2024 Act applies to:
(a) Declarations and executive orders issued on or after January 1, 2018,  and before
January 1, 2026; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, losses incurred and legal fees paid or  incurred in all tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2018.
SECTION 5.
 (1) Any taxpayer who  seeks refunds due to exemption of amounts from
taxation as provided in section 2 or 3 of this 2024  Act, as applicable to tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2021, shall file an amended return for the
applicable tax year.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 314.415  (2), a taxpayer may file a claim for a refund described
in subsection (1) of this section at any time prior to May 15, 2025.
(3) A refund described in this section does not bear interest under ORS 305.220.
SECTION 6.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 28, 2024
Repassed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-B) Page 2